Hawaii statutes.
§841-8 Duty to forward copy of reports to
any county or prosecuting attorney and to person in charge of disposition of
body. (a) Every coroner, or deputy coroner, shall, without delay, forward
to the county attorney in the case of coroners for the counties of Maui and
Kauai, and the prosecuting attorney in the case of coroners for the city and
county of Honolulu and the county of Hawaii, a true and correct copy of the
inquisition.

(b) The coroner's physician shall, in
addition, make available without delay the death certificate of the person
whose death was investigated to the person in charge of the disposition of the
body so that the person in charge may file the death certificate with the local
agent of the department of health as required by section 338-9. [L 1935, c 90,
§8; RL 1945, §10908; RL 1955, §260-8; HRS §715-8; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am
L 1973, c 17, §2; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next